Florida, session 2026, SB1014.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 25 26 Section 1.âSubsection (3) is added to section 180.19, 27 Florida Statutes, to read: 28 180.19âUse by other municipalities and by individuals 29 outside corporate limits.â 30 (3)(a)âAs used in this subsection, the term: 31 1.ââControlling municipalityâ means a municipality 32 operating a utility pursuant to subsection (1) or a municipality 33 that has granted a utility a privilege or franchise pursuant to 34 subsection (2). 35 2.ââMain lineâ means a pipe or conduit that transports 36 wastewater from, or transports potable water to, lateral lines 37 serving multiple properties. The term does not include lateral 38 lines, service connections, customer-owned plumbing or piping 39 located on private property, or any pipe or conduit serving only 40 a single property. 41 3.ââMunicipal utilityâ means a water or sewer utility 42 constituted on the basis of subsection (1) or subsection (2). 43 4.ââOwnerâ means a property owner or an association of 44 property owners. 45 5.ââPropertyâ means lots or lands, or, in the case of an 46 association of property owners, the contiguous group of lots or 47 lands under the association of property owners. 48 6.ââSufficient capacityâ means a water or sewer utility 49 having, as applicable, the infrastructure, water supply, and 50 managerial and financial ability to reliably meet current and 51 reasonably anticipated future water demands for the treatment or 52 disposal of wastewater flows while maintaining compliance with 53 applicable state and federal drinking water and wastewater 54 standards and requirements. 55 (b)âA municipal utility may not decline to extend service 56 to property outside of its corporate limits on the sole basis 57 that the owner refuses to assent or otherwise consent to such 58 property being annexed by that municipal utilityâs controlling 59 municipality, unless the property is subject to an annexation 60 agreement or developer agreement on or before July 1, 2026. 61 (c)âUpon application for service by an owner, a municipal 62 utility must expand its service territory to allow an owner 63 whose property is located outside of the municipal utilityâs 64 existing service territory to connect to the municipal utility, 65 subject to the utilityâs service requirements, if: 66 1.âThe property is not within the service territory of 67 another water or wastewater utility, as applicable; 68 2.âThe municipal utility has sufficient capacity to serve 69 the propertyâs anticipated water or wastewater load, as 70 applicable; 71 3.âThe property is within 1 mile of a main line of the 72 municipal utility, measured by the closest property boundary 73 line from such main line; and 74 4.âThe property owner agrees to pay all fees associated 75 with connection, including fees for infrastructure required to 76 serve the property. 77 (d)âUpon application by an owner pursuant to paragraph (c), 78 the municipal utility must: 79 1.âWithin 90 days after receiving the application, 80 determine whether it has sufficient capacity to provide service 81 to the given property. Such determination may account for any 82 anticipated development on such property. The municipal utility 83 shall provide, in writing, the owner with its determination and 84 the reasons for such determination. 85 2.âIf the municipal utility has sufficient capacity to 86 serve the property, provide the owner with the anticipated fees, 87 charges, contributions, and any other requirements to connect 88 the property to the municipal utility, under its existing fee, 89 charge, and contribution structure, including any proportionate 90 share of onsite, offsite, or systemwide improvements necessary 91 to serve the property. 92 3.âUpon satisfaction of the requirements set forth by the 93 municipal utility pursuant to subparagraph 2., including full 94 payment of, or legally enforceable funding assurances for, all 95 required capital improvements, connect the property to its 96 system in a timely manner. 97 (e)âA municipal utility may establish reasonable minimum 98 filing requirements for an application submitted pursuant to 99 paragraph (c), including: 100 1.âA reasonable estimate of the anticipated water and 101 wastewater load for the property, including accounting for any 102 anticipated development on such property; 103 2.âThe nature of any anticipated development on such 104 property; and 105 3.âAn application fee to cover the reasonable costs 106 associated with conducting the capacity determination and 107 assessing anticipated fees, charges, contributions, and other 108 requirements, pursuant to subparagraphs (d)1. and 2. 109 (f)âIf a municipal utility does not allow an owner to 110 connect to such utility in violation of this subsection, the 111 owner may bring a civil action to enforce this subsection in any 112 court of competent jurisdiction. If the owner prevails in such 113 enforcement action: 114 1.âThe owner may recover reasonable attorney fees and court 115 costs from the municipal utility; and 116 2.âThe court shall order the municipal utility to connect 117 to the ownerâs property in question. 118 (g)âThis subsection may not be construed to prevent a 119 municipal utility from collecting any rate, fee, charge, or 120 contribution authorized under law, including those authorized 121 pursuant to s. 180.191. 122 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.